Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB759.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.048 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby finds that:
(a) 1. There are persons who have distinguished themselves through a variety
of work and educational experiences that could enrich teaching in
Kentucky schools;
2. There are distinguished scholars who wish to become teachers in
Kentucky's public schools, but who did not pursue a teacher preparation
program;
3. There are persons who should be recruited to teach in Kentucky's public
schools as they have academic majors, strong verbal skills as shown by
a verbal ability test, and deep knowledge of content, characteristics that
empirical research identifies as important attributes of quality teachers;
4. There are persons who need to be recruited to teach in Kentucky schools
to meet the diverse cultural and educational needs of students; and
5. There should be alternative procedures to the traditional teacher
preparation programs that qualify persons as teachers;
(b) There are hereby established alternative certification routes[program options]
as described in subsections (2) to (10) of this section;
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Education Professional
Standards Board inform scholars, persons with exceptional work experience,
and persons with diverse backgrounds who have potential as teachers of these
alternative routes[options] and assist local boards of education in
implementing these alternative routes[options] and recruitment of individuals
who can enhance the education system in Kentucky;
(d) The Education Professional Standards Board may reject the application of any
Page 1 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
candidate who is judged as not meeting academic requirements comparable to
those for students enrolled in Kentucky teacher preparation programs; and
(e) The Education Professional Standards Board shall promulgate administrative
regulations establishing standards and procedures for the alternative
routes[certification options] described in this section[. If the certification
option requires employment prior to certification, the procedures shall
establish a process for candidates to obtain an eligible for hire letter from the
Education Professional Standards Board].
(2) The following are the established alternative routes to certification:
(a) [Option 1: Certification of a person with ]Exceptional work experience. An
individual who has exceptional work experience shall receive a one (1) year
provisional certificate with approval by the Education Professional Standards
Board of an application by the individual under the following conditions:
1.[(a)] The application contains documentation of all education and work
experience;
2.[(b)] The candidate has documented exceptional work experience in the
area in which certification is being sought; and
3.[(c)] The candidate possesses:
a.[1.] A bachelor's degree or a graduate degree;
b.[2.] A minimum cumulative grade point average of two and seventy-
five hundredths (2.75) on a four (4) point scale or a minimum
grade point average of three (3.0) on a four (4) point scale on the
last thirty (30) hours of credit completed, including undergraduate
and graduate coursework from a nationally or regionally
accredited postsecondary institution; and
c.[3.] At least one (1) of the following in the area in which certification
is sought:
Page 2 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
i. An academic major or minor of a bachelor's degree;
ii. An academic content area of a graduate degree; or
iii. A passing score on the academic content assessment[ in the
area in which certification is being sought by the applicant as
designated by the Education Professional Standards Board].
After successful completion of one (1) year of teaching and upon the
recommendation of the employing school district to the Education
Professional Standards Board, the candidate shall receive a professional
certificate and shall be subject to certificate renewal requirements the same as
other teachers with a professional certificate.
(b)[(3)] [Option 2: certification through a local school district training program.
A local school district or group of school districts may seek approval for a
training program. The state-approved local school district training program is
an alternative to the college teacher preparation program as a means of
acquiring teacher certification for a teacher at any grade level. The training
program may be offered for all teaching certificates approved by the
Education Professional Standards Board, including interdisciplinary early
childhood education, except for specific certificates for teachers of
exceptional children. To participate in a state-approved local school district
alternative training program, the candidate shall possess:
(a) A bachelor's degree or a graduate degree;
(b) A minimum cumulative grade point average of two and seventy-five
hundredths (2.75) on a four (4) point scale or a minimum grade point average
of three (3) on a four (4) point scale on the last thirty (30) hours of credit
completed, including undergraduate and graduate coursework from a
nationally or regionally accredited postsecondary institution; and
(c) A passing score on the academic content assessment in the area in which
Page 3 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
certification is being sought by the applicant as designated by the Education
Professional Standards Board. To be eligible to take an academic content
assessment, the applicant shall have completed a thirty (30) hour major in the
academic content area or five (5) years of experience in the academic content
area as approved by the Education Professional Standards Board.
An individual may participate in a local school district training program upon
meeting the participation requirements as established in this subsection and
approval by the Education Professional Standards Board of an application by
the individual. The candidate shall be issued a one (1) year provisional
certificate by the Education Professional Standards Board. After successful
completion of the local school district training program, one (1) year of
teaching, and upon the recommendation of the employing school district to
the Education Professional Standards Board, the candidate shall receive a
professional certificate and shall be subject to certificate renewal requirements
the same as other teachers with a professional certificate.
(4) ]College faculty.[Option 3: certification of a professional from a
postsecondary institution:] A candidate who possesses the following
qualifications may receive a one (1) year provisional certificate for teaching at
any level:
1.[(a)] A master's degree or doctoral degree in the academic content area
for which certification is sought; and
2.[(b)] A minimum of five (5) years of full-time teaching experience, or
its equivalent, in the academic content area for which certification is
sought in a regionally or nationally accredited institution of higher
education.
After successful completion of one (1) year of teaching and upon the
recommendation of the employing school district to the Education
Page 4 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
Professional Standards Board, the candidate shall receive a professional
certificate and shall be subject to certificate renewal requirements the same as
other teachers with professional certificates.
(c)[(5)] Adjunct instructor[Option 4: certification of an adjunct instructor]. A
person who has expertise in areas such as art, music, foreign language, drama,
science, computer science, and other specialty areas may be employed as an
adjunct instructor in a part-time position by a local board of education under
KRS 161.046. A person may submit experience as an adjunct instructor to
be considered toward the necessary exceptional experience required under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d)[(6)] Veteran[Option 5: certification of a veteran] of the Armed Forces. The
Education Professional Standards Board shall issue a statement of eligibility,
valid for five (5) years, for teaching at the elementary, secondary, and
secondary career technical education levels to a veteran of the Armed Forces
who was honorably discharged from active duty as evidenced by Defense
Department Form 214 (DD 214) or National Guard Bureau Form 22 or to a
member of the Armed Services currently serving with six (6) or more years of
honorable service, including Reserves, National Guard, or active duty. The
candidate shall possess:
1.[(a)] A bachelor's degree or graduate degree;
2.[(b)] A minimum cumulative grade point average of two and seventy-
five hundredths (2.75) on a four (4) point scale or a minimum grade
point average of three (3) on a four (4) point scale on the last thirty (30)
hours of credit completed, including undergraduate and graduate
coursework from a nationally or regionally accredited postsecondary
institution; and
3.[(c)] At least one (1) of the following in the area in which certification
Page 5 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
is sought:
a. An academic major or minor of a bachelor's degree;
b. An academic content area of a graduate degree; or
c. A passing score on the academic content assessment[ in the area in
which certification is being sought by the applicant as designated
by the Education Professional Standards Board].
The eligible veteran shall receive a one (1) year provisional certificate with
approval by the Education Professional Standards Board of an application by
the veteran. After successful completion of one (1) year of teaching and upon
the recommendation of the employing school district to the Education
Professional Standards Board, the veteran shall receive a professional
certificate.
(e)[(7)] [Option 6: ]University-based [alternative ]program. With approval of
the Education Professional Standards Board, a university may provide an
alternative program that enrolls students in a postbaccalaureate teacher
preparation program concurrently with employment as a teacher in a local
school district. A student in the alternative program shall be granted a one (1)
year provisional certificate. The one (1) year provisional certificate may be
renewed four (4) additional years, and shall be contingent upon the
candidate's continued enrollment in the preparation program and compliance
with all requirements established by the board. A professional certificate shall
be issued upon the teacher candidate's successful completion of the program
and all academic content assessments in the specific teaching field of the
applicant as designated by the Education Professional Standards Board, and
upon the recommendation of the employing school district. The academic
content assessment required in this paragraph may be substituted with an
academic major or minor of a bachelor's degree or an academic content
Page 6 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
area of a graduate degree in the area in which certification is sought.
(f)[(8)] Institute[Option 7: certification of a person in a field other than
education to teach in elementary, middle, or secondary programs]. This
route[option] shall not be limited to teaching in shortage areas. An individual
certified under provisions of this paragraph[subsection] shall be issued a one
(1) year provisional certificate, renewable for a maximum of four (4)
additional years with approval of the Education Professional Standards Board.
1.[(a)] The candidate shall possess:
a.[1.] A bachelor's degree or graduate degree[with a declared academic
major in the area in which certification is sought or a graduate
degree in a field related to the area in which certification is
sought];[ and]
b.[2.] A minimum cumulative grade point average of two and seventy-
five hundredths (2.75) on a four (4) point scale or a minimum
grade point average of three (3) on a four (4) point scale on the last
thirty (30) hours of credit completed, including undergraduate and
graduate coursework from a nationally or regionally accredited
postsecondary institution; and
c. At least one (1) of the following in the area in which certification
is sought:
i. An academic major or minor of a bachelor's degree;
ii. An academic content area of a graduate degree; or
iii. A passing score on the academic content assessment.
2.[(b)] Upon meeting the requirements of subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph[paragraph (a) of this subsection] and enrolling in an
approved institute, the Education Professional Standards Board shall
issue the candidate a one (1) year provisional certificate or during the
Page 7 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
first year of the certificate, the teacher shall complete the following:
a.[1.] For elementary teaching, the individual shall successfully
complete a two hundred forty (240) hour institute that is an
equivalent of six (6) hour days for eight (8) weeks. The providers
and the content of the institute shall be approved by the Education
Professional Standards Board. The content shall include research-
based teaching strategies in reading and math, research on child
and adolescent growth, knowledge of individual differences,
including teaching exceptional children, and methods of classroom
management.
b.[2.] For middle and secondary teaching, the individual shall
successfully complete a one hundred eighty (180) hour institute
that is an equivalent of six (6) hour days for six (6) weeks. The
providers and the content of the institute shall be approved by the
Education Professional Standards Board and shall include
research-based teaching strategies, research on child and
adolescent growth, knowledge of individual differences, including
teaching exceptional children, and methods of classroom
management.
3.[(c)] The candidate shall receive a professional certificate and shall be
subject to certificate renewal requirements the same as other teachers
with a professional certificate:
a.[1.] After meeting the requirements of this route[option];
b.[2.] [After obtaining a passing score on the academic content
assessment in the area in which certification is being sought;
3. ]After successfully completing one (1) year of teaching; and
c.[4.] Upon the recommendation of the employing school district to the
Page 8 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
Education Professional Standards Board.
(g)[(9)] [Option 8: certification of a ]Teach for America[ participant to teach in
elementary, middle, or high schools]. Nothing in this paragraph[subsection]
shall conflict with the participation criteria of the Teach for America program.
An individual certified under this paragraph[subsection] shall be issued a one
(1) year provisional certificate.
1.[(a)] The candidate shall possess:
a.[1.] A bachelor's degree or graduate degree;
b.[2.] A successful completion of the summer training institute and
ongoing professional development required by Teach for America,
including instruction in goal-oriented, standards-based instruction,
diagnosing and assessing students, lesson planning and
instructional delivery, classroom management, maximizing
learning for diverse students, and teaching methodologies; and
c.[3.] At least one (1) of the following in the area in which certification
is sought:
i. An academic major or minor of a bachelor's degree;
ii. An academic content area of a graduate degree; or
iii. A passing score on the academic content assessment[ in the
area in which certification is being sought as designated by
the Education Professional Standards Board].
2.[(b)] The provisional certificate granted under this
paragraph[subsection] may be renewed two (2) times with a
recommendation of the superintendent and approval of the Education
Professional Standards Board.
3.[(c)] A Teach for America participant shall be issued a professional
certificate upon the participant's successful completion of one (1) year
Page 9 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
of teaching[ and the assessments relating to teaching of subject matter
required by the Education Professional Standards Board under KRS
161.030,] and upon the recommendation of the employing school
district to the Education Professional Standards Board[.
(d) Notwithstanding any statute or administrative regulation to the contrary,
a teacher certified under this subsection shall have ten (10) years to
complete a master's degree or fifth year program, or the equivalent as
specified by the Education Professional Standards Board in
administrative regulation].
(h)[(10)] Residency[Option 9: expedited certification of a person to teach at any
grade level through a cooperative program]. With approval of the Education
Professional Standards Board, a college or university may partner with a
school district to develop an expedited certification program that results in a
bachelor's degree and initial certification within three (3) school years.
1.[(a)] The program shall:
a.[1.] Include a residency or paraprofessional component which employs
the person within the participating district for the duration of the
program to gain work experience to supplement the expedited
program and reduced coursework;
b.[2.] Utilize experienced teachers employed by the district to provide
coaching and to mentor the candidates; and
c.[3.] Be designed to meet the needs of the participating district and may
include an emphasis in developing a teacher pipeline for the
district's students, improving the numbers of underrepresented
populations among the district's workforce, or focusing on
increasing the number of teachers with certification areas that are
in high demand.
Page 10 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
2.[(b)] A school district entering into a cooperative partnership shall
ensure the availability of funding for each candidate employed within
the district in the residency or paraprofessional program for the duration
of the candidate's participation in the program. However, nothing in this
paragraph[subsection] shall be interpreted as requiring the district to
continue employing the candidate during the program or after the
candidate has received initial certification.
3.[(c)] A person who has begun a traditional path or another route[option]
for certification shall be eligible to transfer into this route[option] if the
person meets the program's requirements.
4.[(d)] If a school district participating in a cooperative partnership
determines to end the partnership, the district shall no longer accept new
candidates to the program but shall continue the partnership until the
district's employed candidates under this paragraph[for Option 9
certification] complete the program or are no longer employed by the
district.
(3)[(11)] In addition to the alternative routes to certification established under
subsection (2) of this section, there shall be a route to expand certification for a
person who currently holds a professional certificate that was earned through
completion of an approved college or university-based preparation program and
has at least two (2) years of teaching experience as defined in KRS 157.320.
However, a person who holds a professional certificate issued under subsection
(2)(a), (b), (d), or (g) of this section shall only be eligible to expand certification
under this subsection after the first renewal of the professional certificate. A
person who already holds a professional certificate may expand certification:
(a) To an additional area of certification in the same grade band by possessing
at least one (1) of the following in the area in which certification is sought:
Page 11 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
1. An academic major or minor of a bachelor's degree;
2. An academic content area of a graduate degree; or
3. A passing score on the academic content assessment; and
(b) To an additional grade band in the same content area by possessing:
1. At least one (1) of the following to demonstrate content knowledge for
the area in which certification is sought:
a. A certificate for a higher grade band;
b. An academic major or minor of a bachelor's degree;
c. An academic content area of a graduate degree; or
d. A passing score on the academic content assessment; and
2. At least one (1) of the following to demonstrate instructional skills:
a. A certificate that includes the grade band being sought; or
b. A passing score in any professional skill assessment for the
grade band being sought.
(4) A public school teacher certified under subsection (2)[subsections (2) to (10)] of
this section shall be placed on the local district salary schedule for the rank
corresponding to the degree held by the teacher.
(5)[(12)] Subsections (1) to (3) of this section notwithstanding, a candidate who
possesses the following qualifications may receive certification for teaching
programs for exceptional students:
(a) An out-of-state license to teach exceptional students; and
(b) A bachelor's or master's degree in the certification area or closely related area
for which certification is sought.
(6) The Education Professional Standards Board shall develop and maintain a list of
academic majors, academic minors, and graduate degree academic content areas
and the corresponding areas for which they shall satisfy certification
requirements. The list shall be published on the board's website.
Page 12 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
(7) A person shall not be disqualified from seeking additional certifications through
any alternative route established under subsection (2) of this section on the basis
of the person already holding a professional certificate.
(8) For the first renewal of a professional certificate issued under subsection (2)(a),
(b), (d), or (g) of this section, the Education Professional Standards Board shall
require the certificate holder to submit evidence indicating the completion of
trainings established or approved by the Kentucky Department of Education that
train the certificate holder on items specifically mandated by statute on
postsecondary institutions offering teacher preparation programs for the
certificate's area. The Education Professional Standards Board shall compile a
list of the specific statutory mandates and publish the list on the board's website.
(9) This section shall not negate the Education Professional Standards Board's
authority to require a passing score on a professional skills assessment as a
condition for receiving a professional certificate upon completion of an
alternative route under subsection (2) of this section.
(10) Any academic content assessment for a certification area required under this
section shall be the same assessment otherwise required by the Education
Professional Standards Board for initial certification in that area.
Section 2. KRS 161.032 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) There is hereby created a certification incentive fund in the State Treasury to
be administered by the Education Professional Standards Board. The fund
shall provide grants to eligible recipients for conducting institutes as described
in KRS 161.048(2)(f)[(8)], including the costs of salaries of institute
instructors, consultants, materials, stipends and loans to participants, other
costs associated with the institutes, and costs of assistance to teachers
throughout their first year of teaching.
(b) Eligible recipients of grant funds may be nonprofit organizations, institutions,
Page 13 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
and agencies, including but not limited to postsecondary education
institutions, school districts, education cooperatives, and consortia of school
districts.
(c) The Education Professional Standards Board shall promulgate administrative
regulations establishing standards and procedures for the grant program,
including minimal participation levels and maximum grant awards.
(2) (a) The Education Professional Standards Board shall determine priority for
specific institutes.
(b) The board shall request proposals and approve at least one (1) summer
institute for the purpose described in paragraph (a) of this subsection each
academic year. The institute shall be a minimum of ninety (90) clock hours,
based on six (6) hour days for a three (3) week period.
(c) Each individual who completes a summer institute shall have additional hours
of formal instruction or assistance during the first year of teaching to reach the
minimum number of clock hours as required in KRS 161.048(2)(f)2.[(8)(b)].
(d) The candidate shall be assigned a teacher mentor by the grant recipient the
first year of teaching. Payment of the teacher mentor shall be from the grant
provided under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) (a) Individuals who are accepted into an institute shall be provided a forgivable
loan incentive at the beginning of the institute to encourage their participation.
The amount of the forgivable loan shall be determined by the Education
Professional Standards Board. The loan shall be forgiven if the participant
teaches in a Kentucky public or Kentucky Board of Education certified
nonpublic school for one (1) year within the three (3) years following the
awarding of the loan.
(b) If an individual does not successfully complete the institute or teach in a
qualifying Kentucky school, the loan must be repaid according to procedures
Page 14 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
promulgated in administrative regulation by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority.
(c) The Education Professional Standards Board shall enter into a memorandum
of understanding with the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority to
administer the forgivable loan incentive under this section. Based on the
memorandum of understanding, the authority may retain a portion of the
funds for administering the forgivable loan incentive. Funds recovered under
provisions of this section, minus the administrative costs, shall be returned to
the State Treasury.
(4) Each individual who successfully completes a summer institute shall be awarded a
stipend equal to the amount of the forgivable loan as described in subsection (3) of
this section. The stipend shall be awarded at the end of the institute without
restrictions.
(5) Grant recipients and local school districts may offer financial incentives to potential
participants and individuals who complete an institute from fund sources other than
the grant funds.
Section 3. KRS 164.757 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Critical shortage area" means an area in which there are insufficient numbers
of fully certified staff in a particular subject, school, or geographic location;
(b) "Emergency certified teacher" means an individual who has not completed
certification requirements but has been awarded a temporary certificate for a
certification area in which no fully qualified teacher was available;
(c) "Qualified teacher" means a teacher who holds the appropriate certification
for a position unless the superintendent of the employing local school district
has documented evidence that the teacher is unsuitable for appointment;
(d) "Qualified teaching service" means teaching for at least seventy (70) days
Page 15 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
each semester or the equivalent in the certification area for which an
individual received a forgivable loan in the Kentucky school district that
recommended the individual for a loan or in another Kentucky private or
public school district in the certification area for which an individual received
a forgivable loan if no position was available in the recommending school
district at the time when the individual completed his or her certification;
(e) "Semester" means a period which usually makes up one-half (1/2) of a school
year or one-half (1/2) of a postsecondary institution's academic year; and
(f) "Summer term" means an academic period consisting of one (1) or more
sessions of instruction between a spring and a fall semester at a postsecondary
education institution.
(2) To increase the number of qualified teachers in local school districts and to reduce
the number of emergency certified teachers, there is hereby created the district
teacher certification loan fund in the State Treasury. The loans shall be used to
provide forgivable loans to emergency certified personnel, fully certified teachers
who are willing to seek additional certification in hard-to-fill or critical shortage
areas, and paraprofessionals in local school districts to become fully certified
teachers and to continue service within the local district.
(3) The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority. The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations to specify the
terms and conditions of the award, cancellation, and repayment of loans, including
but not limited to the maximum amount that may be loaned per term and the
maximum aggregate amount per applicant, the selection process, eligibility for
renewal, the specific administrative procedures for utilizing the funds, and the rate
of repayment.
(4) To qualify for a forgivable loan, an applicant shall meet the following requirements:
(a) Be employed by a specific local district as a certified teacher, an emergency
Page 16 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
full-time or part-time teacher, an emergency substitute teacher, or a
paraprofessional at the time he or she makes application for the loan;
(b) Be recommended by the superintendent as an individual that he or she would
recommend to be employed in a teaching position for which the applicant is
pursuing certification if the applicant fulfills all credentialing requirements;
(c) Be endorsed by the school-based decision making council of the school in
which he or she serves to receive a loan for the purposes of obtaining teacher
certification in a specific certification area; except that the endorsement shall
not be construed as a commitment of securing a position in the particular
school in the future;
(d) Be admitted and enrolled as an undergraduate or graduate student in a
Kentucky private or public postsecondary institution that offers a teacher
certification program in the area for which he or she is seeking certification;
and
(e) Be enrolled in a minimum of six (6) credit hours and not more than nine (9)
credit hours during each semester of an academic term while employed
concurrently in the school district and in not less than six (6) credit hours
during the summer term. If a school district recommends an applicant for a
loan under provisions of this section and grants a leave of absence to the
employee to pursue certification, the employee shall be enrolled as a full-time
undergraduate or graduate student as defined by the institution in which he or
she is enrolled.
(5) [A participant in a local district alternative certification program as defined in KRS
161.048(2) may be eligible for a loan under provisions of this section to offset costs
associated with the program. The authority shall establish by administrative
regulation the specific requirements, notwithstanding requirements in subsection (4)
of this section.
Page 17 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
(6) ]A loan shall not be awarded or a promissory note cancellation shall not be granted
to any person who is in default on any obligation to the authority under any
program administered pursuant to KRS 164.740 to 164.785 until financial
obligations to the authority are satisfied, except that ineligibility for this reason may
be waived by the authority for cause.
(6)[(7)] Recipients shall render one (1) semester of qualified teaching service for each
semester or summer term for which a loan was received. Upon completion of each
semester of qualified teacher service, the authority shall cancel the appropriate
portion of the promissory notes.
(7)[(8)] If the recipient of a loan fails to complete the certification at a participating
institution or fails to render qualified teaching service in any semester following
certification, unless the failure is temporarily waived for cause by the authority, the
recipient shall immediately become liable to the authority for repayment of the sum
of all outstanding promissory notes and accrued interest. Persons liable for
repayment of loans under this subsection shall be liable for interest accruing from
the dates on which the loans were disbursed.
(8)[(9)] Failure to meet repayment obligations imposed by this section shall be cause
for the revocation of a person's certification, subject to the procedures set forth in
KRS 161.120.
(9)[(10)] All moneys repaid to the authority under this section shall be added to the
fund in this section. Any fund balance at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but
shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and continuously appropriated for the
purposes specified in this section.
(10)[(11)] The authority may execute appropriate contracts and promissory notes for
administering this section.
(11)[(12)] If available funds are insufficient for all requested loans for eligible applicants
during any fiscal year, the authority shall give priority consideration to eligible
Page 18 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1662
applicants who previously received loans. If funds are insufficient to make all
requested renewal loans to eligible applicants, the authority shall reduce all loans to
the extent necessary to provide loans to all qualified renewal applicants. If, after
awarding all eligible renewal applicants, funds are not depleted, priority shall be
given to loans for those applicants who are seeking certification in critical shortage
areas.
Section 4. The following KRS section is repealed:
161.049 Professional support teams -- Training program -- Alternate training
program.
Page 19 of 19
BR166200.100 - 1662 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:13 PM Jacketed